apertium-lin.lin.twol
Alphabet
 A Á Â Ǎ B Ç D E É Ê Ě Ɛ Ɛ́ Ɛ̂ Ɛ̌ Ä F G H I Í Î Ǐ J Ž K L M N Ň O Ó Ô Ǒ Ö Ɔ Ɔ́ Ɔ̂ Ɔ̌ P Q R S Ş T U Ú Û Ǔ Ü W X Y Ý Z
 a á â ǎ b ç d e é ê ě ɛ ɛ́ ɛ̂ ɛ̌ ä f g h i í î ǐ j ž k l m n ň o ó ô ǒ ö ɔ ɔ́ ɔ̂ ɔ̌ p q r s ş t u ú û ǔ ü w x y ý z

%{A%}:a
%>:0
%{í%}:í
%{n%}:n
;


!@ n:n a:a >:0 k:k á:á m:m w:w >:0 {í}:é
!@ t:t o:o >:0 l:l i:i n:n g:g >:0 {í}:í

Sets

Vowel = A E Ä I O Ö U Ü Y Ý
        a e ä i o ö u ü y ý ;

mletters = B E P
            b e p ;

Rules

!"Remove suffix vowel with vowel-ending stem"
!i:0 <=> Vow %{VSUF%}:0 _ [ m | n ] ;

"Verbs stems ending in w take é not í in present tense"
%{í%}:é <=> :w :0 _ .#. ;

"Verbs stems ending in i take é not í in present tense"
%{í%}:é <=> :i :0 _ .#. ;

"Class IX nouns are prefaced by m when followed by b,e,p (by n, otherwise)"
%{n%}:m <=> _ :mletters ;


! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! http://hfst.sourceforge.net/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
